Idaho, session 2026, S1280.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 6, Title 55, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 55-619, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
55-619. TWIN HOMES AND DUPLEXES -- RESTRICTIVE COVENANTS PROHIB-
ITED. (1) No restrictive covenant shall be entered into that prohibits or
unreasonably restricts the construction of duplexes or twin homes, as de-
fined in section 67-6541, Idaho Code, on lots where single-family dwellings
are permitted, excepting lots falling within an area defined as a historic
district under section 67-4607, Idaho Code. Any such covenant is hereby
declared to be against public policy and is void and unenforceable. Any
person attempting to create or enforce such a covenant shall be liable for
any attorney's fees, court costs, and any other damages incurred by the other
party.
(2) Any restrictive covenants as provided pursuant to the provisions of
this section that existed before the effective date of this act shall be void
and unenforceable.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 65, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-6541, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-6541. TWIN HOMES AND DUPLEXES. (1) No county or city shall enact or
enforce any ordinance within its jurisdiction that bans twin homes or du-
plexes in any residential zoning area where single-family dwellings are per-
mitted. "Twin home" means a residential building that consists of two (2)
separate living units that share a wall but where each unit is independently
owned and maintained.
(2) By resolution or ordinance adopted, amended, or repealed in accor-
dance with the notice and hearing procedures provided pursuant to section
67-6509, Idaho Code, each governing board shall amend its comprehensive plan
and land use regulations for all land zoned for single-family residential
uses, except for lands falling within an area defined as a historic district
under section 67-4607, Idaho Code, to:


(a) Permit the development of twin homes and duplexes on any lot where a
detached single-family dwelling is permitted;
(b) Prohibit imposing minimum lot size requirements that would effec-
tively prohibit twin homes or duplexes on a lot where a detached sin-
gle-family dwelling is permitted;
(c) Prohibit requiring more than one (1) off-street parking space per
dwelling unit; and
(d) Prohibit imposing impact fees or utility connection fees on twin
homes or duplexes that are greater than those imposed on single-family
dwellings.
(3) Twin home or duplex projects that meet the jurisdiction's estab-
lished land use requirements shall be approved administratively and as a
matter of right, without the need for discretionary approval, in the same
manner as a single-family dwelling.
(4) Any approval standards, special conditions, and procedures for ap-
proval adopted by a local government shall be clear and objective and shall
not have the effect, either singularly or cumulatively, of discouraging the
development of twin homes or duplexes through unreasonable cost or delay.
Such standards shall not be more restrictive than those applicable to de-
tached single-family dwellings.
(5) A property owner, housing developer, or other affected party may
bring a private cause of action for injunctive relief, monetary damages,
reasonable attorney's fees and costs, and any other appropriate relief
available under law to enforce compliance with the provisions of this sec-
tion.
SECTION 3. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.